Massachusetts, session 194th, H766.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 51 of chapter 111, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the following new paragraph:-
All acute-care hospitals as defined in section twenty-five B, shall have a registered nurse
holding a current unencumbered license from the board of registration in nursing as a sitting and
voting member of the governing entity responsible for developing the organization’s strategic
plan, structure, systems, policies and programs.
SECTION 2. Section 71 of said chapter 111, is hereby amended by adding at the end
thereof the following new paragraph:-
All nursing homes shall have a registered nurse holding a current unencumbered license
from the board of registration in nursing as a sitting and voting member of the governing entity
responsible for developing the organization’s strategic plan, structure, systems, policies and
programs.
of 1